Connecticut, session 2026, HB05568.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 14-49 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) [For] (1) Except as provided in subdivisions (2) and (3) of this
subsection, for the registration of each passenger motor vehicle, the fee
shall be one hundred twenty dollars every three years. [, provided any]
(2) For the registration of each battery electric vehicle, fuel cell electric
vehicle or range-extended battery electric vehicle, as those terms are
defined in section 16-19eee, the fee shall be three hundred forty-five
dollars every three years.
(3) For the registration of each plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, as
defined in section 16-19eee, the fee shall be two hundred thirty-three
dollars every three years.
LCO No. 3002 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5568
(4) Any individual who is sixty-five years of age or older may, at such
individual's discretion, renew the registration of such passenger motor
vehicle, battery electric vehicle, fuel cell electric vehicle, range-extended
battery electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, owned by such
individual for either a one-year period or the registration period as
determined by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) of section
14-22. The registration fee shall be prorated accordingly for any such
registration that is renewed for a one-year period.
(5) The triennial fee for the registration of any motor vehicle for which
special license plates have been issued under the provisions of section
14-20 shall be one hundred twenty dollars. The provisions of this
[subsection relative to the triennial fee charged for the registration of
each antique, rare or special interest motor vehicle for which special
license plates have been issued under section 14-20] subdivision shall
not apply to (A) an antique fire apparatus or transit bus owned by a
nonprofit organization and maintained primarily for use in parades,
exhibitions or other public events but not for purposes of general
transportation, (B) a battery electric vehicle, (C) a fuel cell electric
vehicle, (D) a range-extended battery electric vehicle, or (E) a plug-in
hybrid electric vehicle.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 14-49(a)